District of Columbia statutes.
50-2206.52b

Notification regarding admissibility of breath test results in a criminal proceeding.

Any person upon whom a breath specimen is collected shall be informed, in writing, of the provisions of §§ 50-2206.52 and 50-2206.52a at the time that person is charged.

Sept. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-145, § 3q-2
as added Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-260, § 4(b), 60 DCR 1292
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-260 added this section.
Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-260 provided that the act shall apply as of the effective date of the Comprehensive Impaired Driving and Alcohol Breath Testing Program Amendment Act of 2012, signed by the Mayor on October 24, 2012 (D.C. Act 19-489; 59 DCR 12957), which became D.C. Law 19-266, effective April 27, 2013.